SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.dic
çăмха/A
çаран/A
çунат/A
çыран/A
ăйхă/A
ăнăçсăр/A
ăнсăрлăх/A
ăрсурник/A
ăслăх/A
ăсталану/A
ĕрчев/A
Аден/A
Айтарман/A
Акташ/A
Алманч/A
Алюнкка/A
Антарес/A
Аполлонович/A
Арканзас/A
Артёмович/A
Ахван/A
Багдад/A
Бахрейн/A
Бенин/A
Бомбей/A
Бронислав/A
Вайулла/A
Варфоломей/A
Велюш/A
Вильнюс/A
Владимир/A
Воскресенск/A
Гаврилович/A
Геннадий/A
Гильберт/A
Гринвич/A
Давидович/A
Демьянович/A
Дижон/A
Дортмунд/A
Егорович/A
Енюк/A
Ефремович/A
Занзибар/A
Иçлюк/A
Икар/A
Илчура/A
Ильтулă/A
Ипай/A
Исанпай/A
Иштукан/A
Кăтлă/A
Кĕчукка/A
Каменногорск/A
Карл/A
Катюк/A
Кирилл/A
Кнеслу/A
Корф/A
Куçтук/A
Курамша/A
Лебедев/A
Лесозаводск/A
Лукьян/A
Мăрса/A
Магомет/A
Малай/A
Мартынович/A
Медвежьегорск/A
Миккуш/A
Минск/A
Минюкка/A
Михалкка/A
Монблан/A
Мурсаккай/A
Назарович/A
Нерчинск/A
Никифорович/A
Норильск/A
Нямах/A
Онуфрий/A
Ош/A
Пайкач/A
Пайсултан/A
Парамон/A
Пейсулла/A
Петруç/A
Пикпав/A
Питăркка/A
Питтупай/A
Полинг/A
Пуçут/A
Резерфорд/A
Романович/A
Сăливан/A
Савкка/A
Салапай/A
Санук/A
Сах/A
Сверук/A
Семёнович/A
Серкуç/A
Сетрухха/A
Сильмук/A
Синьукка/A
Смоленск/A
Стамбул/A
Султав/A
Таджикистан/A
Тарасович/A
Терук/A
Тимулла/A
Тохтар/A
Туйпаттăр/A
Туньухха/A
Тютян/A
Уламас/A
Уняркка/A
Уссурийск/A
Ухтийар/A
Ферапонт/A
Фёдорович/A
Харбин/A
Хрул/A
Хьюстон/A
Чистай/A
Шеверчук/A
Шомила/A
Эйлер/A
Элюк/A
Эридан/A
Ювенальевич/A
Яков/A
Янтăпай/A
Ярсăпай/A
аçа/A
абразив/A
авангард/A
авиаклуб/A
авкаланчăк/A
автограф/A
автомашинист/A
авторитетсăр/A
агитвагон/A
агроном/A
азербайджан/A
айванкка/A
ака/A
акиçак/A
активлăх/A
алăсăр/A
аллăшарлăх/A
алхапăлта/A
альт/A
амвон/A
анăрав/A
анаслу/A
аннексионист/A
антагонизм/A
антитезис/A
апăс/A
апостол/A
аптрав/A
арбуз/A
арканчăк/A
арпашăнчăк/A
архангел/A
ас/A
асамат/A
аскетлăх/A
астматик/A
атеизм/A
атрофилен/A
аффикс/A
ачамак/A
аэроклуб/A
балл/A
баръер/A
бензовоз/A
бис/A
бортинженер/A
броненосец/A
бункер/A
вăйсăрлăх/A
вăтанулăх/A
ванчăк/A
веер/A
вешка/A
вкладчик/A
вулĕçтăвком/A
вырма/A
гарнир/A
геноцид/A
гидромелиоратор/A
гольф/A
гранатомётчик/A
гунн/A
декадент/A
деспотизм/A
дивидент/A
диссонанс/A
доминион/A
дуэт/A
жулик/A
замполит/A
знаменосец/A
избач/A
импортёр/A
инструктаж/A
искусствовед/A
йăлмак/A
йăрпăк/A
йытăлăх/A
кăлава/A
кăнăш/AE
кăтарту/A
каçмăк/A
казак/A
калак/A
камбуз/A
кантармăш/A
капор/A
карантин/A
карлик/A
каршака/A
катăрмак/A
качака/A
кварц/A
кинескоп/A
китаец/A
кнеç/A
колонизатор/A
комментатор/A
конвойнăй/A
контрабас/A
корд/A
костер/A
кредитор/A
крыльца/A
кукрашка/A
кумкăч/A
купчашка/A
курултай/A
куштанлăх/A
лавкка/A
ландыш/A
ларкăч/A
ледник/A
лигроин/A
литературовед/A
лот/A
лютеран/A
мăнăш/A
мăштăркка/A
майонез/A
малашлăхсăр/A
марçă/A
маскарад/A
маххан/A
мельхиор/A
метр/A
миллиграмм/A
модельер/A
морс/A
мулçă/A
муталанчăк/A
навозопогрузчик/A
народник/A
негатив/A
ногай/A
обойщик/A
омлет/A
оргкомитет/A
отряд/A
пăр/HA
пăсан/A
пăшал/A
пакарта/A
палтус/A
панчас/A
парашютист/A
парторг/A
патриархат/A
паяльщик/A
перрон/A
пиншак/A
плановик/A
повар/A
позитивизм/A
полюс/A
посёлок/A
прейскурант/A
принциплăх/A
продмаг/A
протеин/A
психологизм/A
пулăшакан/A
пурçăн/A
пуслăх/A
пуша/A
раввин/A
радон/A
рапорт/A
реальнăй/A
реестр/A
рельссăр/A
реформатор/A
ростбиф/A
сăваплăх/A
сăпăрчăк/A
сăхăлăх/A
саймăрша/A
самăрлăх/A
сантал/A
саранча/A
сахаллăх/A
секвестр/A
сервант/A
сингармонизм/A
склад/A
сменăлăх/A
сонет/A
специалист/A
стан/A
стерлинг/A
строй/A
суйхăсăр/A
сунтăх/A
сутлашу/A
сывлăшлăх/A
сюжет/A
тăлă/A
тăнлăх/A
тăркăш/A
тăхтав/A
тавраш/A
талак/A
танкист/A
тарăху/A
ташпан/A
теннис/A
тип/AG
торгпред/A
транспорт/A
тромб/A
тукун/A
тунсăх/A
турă/A
туртма/A
тухтăр/A
тюльпан/A
удав/A
укроп/A
ум/A
уран/A
услам/A
ухатник/A
фазотрон/A
фатализм/A
физрук/A
флотоводец/A
фото/A
фронтон/A
хăйăк/A
хăмпă/A
хăрушсăрлăх/A
хĕçпăшалсăр/A
хаклăх/A
хапăлсăр/A
хедер/A
хормейстер/A
хулсăр/A
хур/AW
хускавсăр/A
хыçсăмах/A
хысма/A
цикл/A
чăм/AH
чăтăмлăх/A
чама/A
чек/A
чупкăн/A
шăкăлчан/A
шăнкарăк/A
шăршлаккай/A
шалăп/A
шапа/A
шаттун/A
шип/A
шор/A
штопор/A
шурăлăх/A
шывсăрлăх/A
ыран/A
эклектизм/A
экстремизм/A
эмбрион/A
эскиз/A
юла/A
юпă/A
юставсăр/A
ял/A
япала/A
яшка/A
